src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Reflexive !!= * @CODE@

+Sg+Nom:jiõčč K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Sg+Nom:jiičč K ;
+Pl+Nom:jiijj K ;
+Gen+Sg3:jiijjâs	K ;
+Acc+Sg3:jiijjâs	K ;
+Gen+Pl1:jieʹččen	K ;
+Acc+Pl1:jieʹččen	K ;
+Gen:jiõčč		GA-I ;
+Acc:jiõčč		GA-I ;
+Gen:jiičč		GA-I ;
+Acc:jiičč		GA-I ;
+Gen:jiijj		GA-II ;
+Acc:jiijj		GA-II ;
+Gen:jiiʹjj		GA-II ;
+Acc:jiiʹjj		GA-II ;
+Ill:jiõccs		ILEPX ;
+Ill:jiccs		ILEPX ;
+Loc:jijst		ILEPX ;
+Loc:jiijjst		LOCPX ;
+Ess:jiõččn		ILEPX ;
+Com:jijj		COMPX ;


LEXICON PRON_PUK
!! Completion needed 2015-09-19
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i K ;
+Pl+Acc:%>id K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>id K ;
+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;

LEXICON GA-I !!= * @CODE@
+Sg1:an K ;
+Pl1:ân K ;

LEXICON GA-II !!= * @CODE@
+Sg2:ad K ;
+Pl1:ân K ;
+Pl2:âd K ;
+Pl3:âz K ;

LEXICON ILEPX !!= * @CODE@
ROBLSGPX ;
ROBLPLPX ;

LEXICON LOCPX !!= * @CODE@
+Sg1:an	K ;
ROBLPLPX ;

LEXICON COMPX !!= * @CODE@
ROBLSGPX ;
RCOMPLPX ;

LEXICON ROBLSGPX !!= * @CODE@
+Sg1:an K ;
+Sg2:ad K ;
+Sg3:es K ;

LEXICON ROBLPLPX !!= * @CODE@
+Pl1:een K ;
+Pl2:eed K ;
+Pl3:eez K ;

LEXICON RCOMPLPX !!= * @CODE@
+Pl1:eenvuiʹm K ;
+Pl2:eedvuiʹm K ;
+Pl3:eezvuiʹm K ;




!! ## Interrogative pronouns
LEXICON PRON-INTERR_
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** is referred to from the xml file, hence does not assign **+Pron** tag.
+Interr: # ; !!≈ * @CODE@

LEXICON Interrogative !!= * @CODE@ is referred to from `pronouns.lexc`, hence assigns **+Pron** tag.
mii+Pron+Interr:m	MK ; !!= * @CODE@ The Epsilon  inserted 2015-02-11
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩ	MK ; !!= * @CODE@ The Epsilon  inserted 2015-02-11
mii+Pron+Interr:mõõ	MK-long ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-long ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mõ	MK-short ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-short ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mââ	MK-low ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-low ;
mii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:mâʹst	K ;
mii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:mâiʹd K ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:ǩeäʹst K ;

kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:kååʹtt K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:koon K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:koon K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:koonn K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:koonn K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:koozz K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:koʹst K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com:kooin K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:kook K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen:kooi K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen:koi K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc:koid K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill:koid K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc:koin K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc:kooin K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com:koivuiʹm K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl:kooiǥ K ;

LEXICON MK !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Nom:ii	K ;

LEXICON MK-long !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:n	K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:n	K ;
+Sg+Acc:nn	K ;
+Sg+Gen:nn	K ;
+Sg+Ill:zz	K ;
+Pl+Nom:k	K ;

LEXICON MK-short !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Com:in	K ;
+Sg+Abe:ntää	K ;
MK-PL-short ;

LEXICON MK-PL-short !!= * @CODE@
+Pl+Acc:iʹd	K ;
+Pl+Ill:iʹd	K ;

LEXICON MK-low !!= * @CODE@
+Ess:ʹđen	K ;
+Par:ʹđ	K ;
+Par:ʹđed	K ;
+Pl+Com:ivuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe:itää	K ;

LEXICON INDEF-MK !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Nom:ii-ne	K ;

LEXICON INDEF-MK-long !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Acc:n-ne	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n-ne	K ;
+Sg+Ill:zz-ne	K ;
+Sg+Abe:nn-ne-tää	K ;
+Pl+Nom:k-ne	K ;

LEXICON INDEF-MK-low-short !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Loc:ʹstt-ne K ; 
+Pl+Acc:iʹd-ne	K ;
+Pl+Ill:iʹd-ne	K ;

LEXICON INDEF-MK-low !!= * @CODE@
+Ess:ʹđen-ne	K ;
+Par:ʹđ-ne	K ;
+Par:ʹđed-ne	K ;
+Pl+Com:i-ne-vuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe:i-ne-tää	K ;

LEXICON DISTR-MK !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Nom:ii-a	K ;

LEXICON DISTR-MK-long !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Acc:n-a	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n-a	K ;
+Sg+Ill:zz-a	K ;
+Sg+Abe:nn-a-tää	K ;
+Pl+Nom:k-a	K ;

LEXICON DISTR-MK-low-short !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Loc:ʹstt-a K ; 
+Pl+Acc:iʹd-a	K ;
+Pl+Ill:iʹd-a	K ;

LEXICON DISTR-MK-low !!= * @CODE@
+Ess:ʹđen-a	K ;
+Par:ʹđ-a	K ;
+Par:ʹđed-a	K ;
+Pl+Com:i-a-vuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe:i-a-tää	K ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT_
+Qnt: # ; ! THIS NEEDS FIXING.2018-01-10



LEXICON Relative !!= * @CODE@
mii+Pron+Rel:m       MK ;
ǩii+Pron+Rel:ǩ       MK ;
mii+Pron+Rel:mõõ     MK-long ;
ǩii+Pron+Rel:ǩeä     MK-long ;
mii+Pron+Rel:mõ      MK-short ;
ǩii+Pron+Rel:ǩeä     MK-short ;
mii+Pron+Rel:mââ     MK-low ;
ǩii+Pron+Rel:ǩeä     MK-low ;
mii+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc:mâʹst	K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:kååʹtt K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:koon K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:koon K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc:koonn K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen:koonn K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill:koozz K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc:koʹst K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com:kooin K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom:kook K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen:kooi K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen:koi K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc:koid K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill:koid K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Loc:koin K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Loc:kooin K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com:koivuiʹm K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com:kooivuiʹm K ;
kååʹtt+Pron+Rel+Sg+Prl:kooiǥ K ;
!kååʹtt+Pron+Rel:koot K ; 

LEXICON Indefinite !!= * @CODE@
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:m       INDEF-MK ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩ       INDEF-MK ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:mõõ     INDEF-MK-long ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩeä     INDEF-MK-long ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:mâ      INDEF-MK-low-short ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩeä     INDEF-MK-low-short ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:mââ     INDEF-MK-low ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩeä     INDEF-MK-low ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com:ǩeäinn-ne K ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com:mõiʹnn-ne K ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc:ǩeäinn-ne K ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc:mâiʹnn-ne K ;
mii-ne+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc:mâʹst-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:kååʹtt-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:koon-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:koon-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc:koonn-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen:koonn-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill:koozz-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc:koʹst-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com:kooin-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom:kook-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen:kooi-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc:koid-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill:koid-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc:koin-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc:kooin-ne K ;
kååʹtt-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl:kooiǥ-ne K ;

kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:kuäbbaž-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc:kuäbba-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen:kuäbba-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill:kuäbbže-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc:kuäbbast-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com:kuäbbain-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abe:kuäbba-ne-tää K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Ess:kuäbbžen-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Par:kuäbbžed-ne K ;

kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom:kuäbba-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen:kuäbbai-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc:kuäbbaid-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill:kuäbbaid-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc:kuäbbain-ne K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com:kuäbbai-ne-vuiʹm K ;
kuäbbaž-ne+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abe:kuäbbai-ne-tää K ;
