src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
jiõčč+Pron+Refl: Reflexive ;     !!= * @CODE@
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiõčč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiõčč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiičč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiičč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiijj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiijj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiiʹjj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiiʹjj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ill:jiõccs		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ill:jiccs		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Loc:jijst		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Loc:jiijst		LOCPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ess:jiõččn		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Com:jijj		COMPX ;
mii+Pron+Interr:m	MK ; !!= * @CODE@
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩ	MK ; !!= * @CODE@
mii+Pron+Interr:mõõ	MK-long ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-long ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mõ	MK-short ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-short ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mââ	MK-low ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-low ;
